District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-803

Trustees; directors and managers; powers; quorum; vacancies; methods of voting.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1284, ch. 854, § 601
June 10, 1930, 46 Stat. 538, ch. 439
Nov. 30, 1945, 59 Stat. 588, ch. 497
Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 882, ch. 781
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(7), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-803.
1981 Ed., § 29-1003.
1973 Ed., § 29-603.